District of Columbia statutes.
47-2502

Bonding, title, guaranty and fidelity companies.

All companies, incorporated or otherwise, who guarantee the fidelity of any individual or individuals, such as bonding companies, and all companies who furnish abstracts of titles to real property, or who insure real estate titles, shall pay to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia 3% of their gross receipts in the District of Columbia.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 619, ch. 1352, § 6, par. 6
Apr. 28, 1904, 33 Stat. 564, ch. 1815
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title V, § 501(a)(2), 22 DCR 2105
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2502.
1973 Ed., § 47-1702.
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.